Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.090

Office of crime victims advocacy—Ad hoc advisory committees.

The director of the department of commerce may establish ad hoc advisory committees, as necessary, to obtain advice and guidance regarding the office of crime victims advocacy program.

[ 2012 c 29 s 8; 1995 c 269 s 2102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.